bg-BG: Конна дисциплина: Барел рейсинг; Кътинг; Обездка; Конен пробег; Английска езда; Всестранна езда; Хънтър; Поло; Рейнинг; Родео; Роупинг; Садъл сийт; Прескачане на препятствия; Езда по маршрут; Уестърн плежър; Друго
pl: Dyscyplina jeździecka: Wyścigi wokół beczek; Odłączanie bydła (cutting); Ujeżdżenie; Rajdy długodystansowe; Angielski; Wszechstronny Konkurs Konia Wierzchowego (WKKW); Klasa hunter; Polo; Reining; Rodeo; Roping; Saddle seat; Skoki przez przeszkody; Jazda po szlaku (trail); Western pleasure; Inne
es: Disciplina ecuestre: Carreras de barriles; Aparta de ganado; Doma clásica; Enduro ecuestre; Inglesa; Concurso completo; Cazador; Polo; Reining; Rodeo; Enlazado; Saddle seat; Salto ecuestre; Paseo a caballo; Western pleasure; Otra
de: Reitsportdisziplin: Barrel Racing; Cutting; Dressur; Distanzreiten; Englisch; Vielseitigkeitsreiten; Hunter; Polo; Reining; Rodeo; Roping; Saddle Seat; Springreiten; Wanderreiten; Western Pleasure; Sonstige
ro-RO: Disciplina ecvestră: Barrel racing; Cutting; Dresaj; Echitație de anduranță; Stil englezesc; Probă completă; Hunter; Polo; Reining; Rodeo; Roping; Saddle seat; Sărituri peste obstacole; Călărie de agrement; Western pleasure; Altele
cs: Jezdecká disciplína: Barrel racing; Cutting; Drezura; Vytrvalostní ježdění; Anglický styl; Všestrannost; Hunter; Pólo; Reining; Rodeo; Roping; Saddle seat; Parkurové skákání; Trail riding; Western pleasure; Jiné
ko: 승마 종목: 배럴 레이싱; 커팅; 마장마술; 지구력 승마; 잉글리시; 종합마술; 헌터; 폴로; 레이닝; 로데오; 로핑; 새들 시트; 장애물 비월; 트레일 라이딩; 웨스턴 플레저; 기타
ru: Конный вид спорта: Баррел-рейсинг; Каттинг; Выездка; Конные пробеги; Английская езда; Троеборье; Хантер; Поло; Рейнинг; Родео; Роупинг; Сэдл-сит; Конкур; Трейл; Вестерн-плежер; Другое
el: Ιππικό αγώνισμα: Αγώνες βαρελιών; Διαχωρισμός αγέλης (cutting); Ιππική δεξιοτεχνία; Ιππική αντοχή; Αγγλική ιππασία; Ιππικό τρίαθλο; Επίδειξη αλμάτων (Hunter); Πόλο; Χαλιναγώγηση (Reining); Ροντέο; Σύλληψη με λάσο (Roping); Αγγλική ιππασία επίδειξης (Saddle seat); Υπερπήδηση εμποδίων; Ιππασία ελεύθερου πεδίου; Ιππασία επίδειξης Western; Άλλο
sv: Ridsportdisciplin: Barrel racing; Cutting; Dressyr; Distansritt; Engelsk ridning; Fälttävlan; Hunter; Hästpolo; Reining; Rodeo; Roping; Saddle seat; Banhoppning; Turridning; Western pleasure; Annat
sk-SK: Jazdecká disciplína: Preteky okolo sudov; Cutting; Drezúra; Vytrvalostné jazdenie; Anglické; Všestranná spôsobilosť; Hunter; Pólo; Reining; Rodeo; Roping; Saddle seat; Parkúrové skákanie; Trailové jazdenie; Western pleasure; Iné
hr-HR: Konjička disciplina: Barrel racing; Cutting; Dresurno jahanje; Daljinsko jahanje; Englesko jahanje; Konjički višeboj; Hunter; Polo; Reining; Rodeo; Roping; Saddle seat; Preponsko jahanje; Terensko jahanje; Western pleasure; Ostalo
lt-LT: Jojimo disciplina: Jojimas aplink statinaites; Galvijų atskyrimas; Dailusis jojimas; Ištvermės jojimas; Angliškasis; Trijovė; Medžioklinis jojimas; Polas; Reiningas; Rodeo; Gaudymas lasu; Balninis jojimas; Konkūrai; Jojimas gamtoje; Vesterno pramoginis jojimas; Kita
sl-SI: Konjeniška disciplina: Jahanje okoli sodov; Cutting; Dresura; Vzdržljivostno jahanje; Angleško jahanje; Vsestranskost; Hunter; Polo; Reining; Rodeo; Roping; Saddle seat; Preskakovanje ovir; Terensko jahanje; Western pleasure; Drugo
fr: Discipline équestre: Course de barils; Cutting; Dressage; Endurance; Équitation classique; Concours complet; Hunter; Polo; Reining; Rodéo; Roping; Saddle seat; Saut d’obstacles; Randonnée équestre; Plaisir western; Autre
pt-PT: Disciplina equestre: Corrida de barris; Apartação; Dressage; Resistência equestre; Equitação inglesa; Concurso completo; Hunter; Pólo; Rédeas; Rodeio; Laço; Saddle seat; Salto de obstáculos; Passeios a cavalo; Western pleasure; Outro
it: Disciplina equestre: Barrel racing; Cutting; Dressage; Endurance; Inglese; Concorso completo; Hunter; Polo; Reining; Rodeo; Roping; Saddle seat; Salto ostacoli; Trekking a cavallo; Western pleasure; Altro
fi: Ratsastuslaji: Tynnyriratsastus; Cutting; Kouluratsastus; Matkaratsastus; Englantilainen ratsastus; Kenttäratsastus; Hunter; Poolo; Reining; Rodeo; Lassonta; Saddle seat; Esteratsastus; Maastoratsastus; Western pleasure; Muu
zh-TW: 馬術項目: 繞桶賽; 截牛賽; 馬場馬術; 耐力賽; 英式騎乘; 三日賽; 獵馬賽; 馬球; 西部馬術; 牛仔競技; 套牛賽; 鞍式騎乘; 障礙超越; 野外騎乘; 西部休閒騎乘; 其他
nl: Paardensport discipline: Barrelracing; Cutting; Dressuur; Endurance; Engels; Eventing; Hunter; Polo; Reining; Rodeo; Roping; Saddleseat; Springen; Trailrijden; Western pleasure; Overig
nb: Ridesportdisiplin: Barrel racing; Cutting; Dressur; Distanseridning; Engelsk; Feltritt; Hunter; Polo; Reining; Rodeo; Roping; Saddle seat; Sprangridning; Terrengridning; Western pleasure; Annet
hu: Lovas sportág: Hordókerülés; Cutting; Díjlovaglás; Távlovaglás; Angol stílus; Lovastusa; Vadászugratás; Lovaspóló; Reining; Rodeó; Lasszózás; Saddle seat; Díjugratás; Tereplovaglás; Western pleasure; Egyéb
tr: Binicilik disiplini: Varil yarışı; Cutting; Dresaj; Atlı dayanıklılık; İngiliz; Konkur komple; Hunter; Polo; Reining; Rodeo; Kement atma; Saddle seat; Engel atlama; Arazi binişi; Western pleasure; Diğer
vi: Môn cưỡi ngựa: Đua ngựa vòng thùng; Cắt bầy (Cutting); Biểu diễn cưỡi ngựa (Dressage); Cưỡi ngựa đường trường; Cưỡi ngựa kiểu Anh; Ba môn phối hợp (Eventing); Thợ săn (Hunter); Mã cầu (Polo); Điều khiển ngựa (Reining); Cưỡi ngựa bắt bò (Rodeo); Quăng dây bắt bò; Cưỡi ngựa yên cao (Saddle seat); Nhảy ngựa chướng ngại vật; Cưỡi ngựa địa hình; Biểu diễn ngựa kiểu miền Tây; Khác
th: ประเภทกีฬาขี่ม้า: ขี่ม้าอ้อมถัง; คัตติ้ง; ศิลปะการบังคับม้า; ขี่ม้ามาราธอน; อิงลิช; อีเวนติ้ง; ฮันเตอร์; โปโล; รีนนิ่ง; โรดีโอ; โรปปิ้ง; แซดเดิลซีท; ขี่ม้ากระโดดข้ามเครื่องกีดขวาง; ขี่ม้าชมธรรมชาติ; เวสเทิร์นเพลเชอร์; อื่นๆ
da: Ridedisciplin: Barrel racing; Cutting; Dressur; Distanceridning; Engelsk; Military; Hunter; Polo; Reining; Rodeo; Roping; Saddle seat; Ridebanespringning; Skovtur; Western pleasure; Andet
zh-CN: 马术项目: 绕桶赛; 截牛赛; 盛装舞步; 耐力赛; 英式; 三项赛; 猎人障碍赛; 马球; 西部驭马术; 牛仔竞技; 套牛; 鞍式骑乘; 场地障碍赛; 野外骑乘; 西部休闲骑乘; 其他
en: Equestrian discipline: Barrel racing; Cutting; Dressage; Endurance riding; English; Eventing; Hunter; Polo; Reining; Rodeo; Roping; Saddle seat; Show jumping; Trail riding; Western pleasure; Other
pt-BR: Modalidade de equitação: Prova de três tambores; Apartação; Adestramento; Enduro equestre; Inglês; Concurso Completo de Equitação; Salto (Hunter); Polo; Rédeas; Rodeio; Laço; Saddle seat; Salto; Cavalgada; Western pleasure; Outro
ja: 馬術競技: バレルレーシング; カッティング; 馬場馬術; エンデュランス馬術; ブリティッシュ; 総合馬術; ハンター; ポロ; レイニング; ロデオ; ローピング; サドルシート; 障害馬術; トレイルライディング; ウェスタンプレジャー; その他